South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3545.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 9, Chapter 15, Title 58 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 58-15-915. A train operating in a municipality between the hours of 7 a.m. to 9 a.m., 12 p.m. to 2 p.m., and 4 p.m. to 6 p.m. may not block a four-lane intersection of a public road for more than five minutes in a one hour period. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----